Maryland, session 2026, HB0143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
(3) “Commission” means the Public Service Commission.
(4) “PJM” means PJM Interconnection, LLC.
(b) The General Assembly finds and declares that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0143*

HOUSE BILL 143
(1) PJM’s actions have resulted in increased costs and decreased
affordability for electricity ratepayers; and
(2) PJM has failed to:
(i) adequately address concerns about the impact of rate increases
on ratepayers; or
(ii) be responsive to State energy policies.
(c) The Commission, in consultation with the Administration, shall study the
benefits and costs of requiring each electric company in the State to demonstrate to the
Commission that it has contracted for at least 80% of its load–serving capacity over the
next 5–year period.
(d) In consultation with neighboring states, the Commission and the
Administration jointly shall study the benefits and costs of, and make recommendations
on, potential options for:
(1) withdrawing from the PJM capacity market model and developing a
multistate compact to engage in the fixed resource requirement alternative to secure
electric capacity through:
(i) entering into contracts with private entities; or
(ii) competitive capacity auctions; and
(2) withdrawing from PJM and:
(i) establishing an independent regional transmission organization;
or
(ii) joining an existing regional transmission organization operating
in another region or state.
(e) On or before December 31, 2026, the Commission and the Administration
jointly shall submit a report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on their findings and recommendations under
subsections (c) and (d) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.